Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.480

Reporting of harassment, intimidation, or bullying—Retaliation prohibited—Immunity.

(1) No school employee, student, or volunteer may engage in reprisal, retaliation, or false accusation against a victim, witness, or one with reliable information about an act of harassment, intimidation, or bullying.

(2) A school employee, student, or volunteer who has witnessed, or has reliable information that a student has been subjected to, harassment, intimidation, or bullying, whether verbal or physical, is encouraged to report such incident to an appropriate school official.

(3) A school employee, student, or volunteer who promptly reports an incident of harassment, intimidation, or bullying to an appropriate school official, and who makes this report in compliance with the procedures in the district's policy prohibiting bullying, harassment, or intimidation, is immune from a cause of action for damages arising from any failure to remedy the reported incident.

[ 2002 c 207 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2002 c 207: "The legislature declares that a safe and civil environment in school is necessary for students to learn and achieve high academic standards. The legislature finds that harassment, intimidation, or bullying, like other disruptive or violent behavior, is conduct that disrupts both a student's ability to learn and a school's ability to educate its students in a safe environment.

Furthermore, the legislature finds that students learn by example. The legislature commends school administrators, faculty, staff, and volunteers for demonstrating appropriate behavior, treating others with civility and respect, and refusing to tolerate harassment, intimidation, or bullying." [ 2002 c 207 s 1.]